California statutes. Business and Professions Code
No retail license limited in numbers, off-sale beer and wine license, on-sale beer and wine license, on-sale beer and wine public premises license, on-sale beer license, on-sale beer public premises license, or on-sale general license for seasonal business, shall be transferred unless before the filing of the transfer application with the department the licensee or the intended transferee records in the office of the county recorder of the county or counties in which the premises to which the license has been issued are situated a notice of the intended transfer, stating all of the following:

(a) The name and address of the licensee.

(b) The name and address of the intended transferee.

(c) The kind of license or licenses intended to be transferred.

(d) The address or addresses of the premises to which the license or licenses have been issued.

(e) An agreement between the parties to the transfer that the consideration for the transfer of the business and license or licenses, if any there be, is to be paid only after the transfer is approved by the department.

(f) The place where the purchase price or consideration for the transfer of the business and license or licenses is to be paid, the amount of such purchase price or consideration, and a description of the entire consideration, including a designation of cash, checks, promissory notes, and tangible and intangible property, and the amount of each thereof.

(g) The name and address of the escrow holder referred to in Section 24074, or of the guarantor referred to in Section 24074.4, as the case may be.

A copy of the notice of intended transfer, certified by the county recorder, shall be filed with the department together with a transfer application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 816.)
-------------------------------------------

24074.

Before the filing of such a transfer application with the department, if the intended transfer of the business or license involves a purchase price or consideration, the licensee and the intended transferee shall establish an escrow with some person, corporation, or association not a party to the transfer acting as escrow holder, and the intended transferee shall deposit with the escrow holder the full amount of the purchase price or consideration. The transfer application shall be accompanied by a description of the entire consideration. The description shall include a designation of cash, checks, promissory notes, and tangible and intangible property, and the amount of each thereof. The licensee and intended transferee shall also enter into an agreement, which agreement shall be deposited with the escrow holder, directing the escrow holder, after the requirements for transfer as provided in Section 24049 are satisfied, to pay out of the purchase price or consideration, whether the consideration takes the form of cash, checks, promissory notes, or tangible or intangible property, the claims of the bona fide creditors of the licensee who file their claims with the escrow holder before the escrow holder is notified by the department of its approval of the transfer of the license or if the purchase price or consideration is not sufficient to pay the claims in full, to distribute the consideration as follows:

First, to the United States for claims based on income or withholding taxes; and thereafter for claims based on any tax other than specified in Section 24049. 

Second, to the payment of claims for wages, salaries, or fringe benefits of employees of the seller or transferor earned or accruing prior to the sale, transfer, or opening of an escrow for the sale thereof.

Third, to the payment of claims of secured creditors to the extent of the proceeds which arise from the sale of the security.

Fourth, to the payment of claims on mechanics’ liens.

Fifth, to the payment of escrow fees and the payment of claims for prevailing brokerage fees for services rendered and claims for reasonable attorney’s fees for services rendered.

Sixth, to the payment of claims for goods sold and delivered to the transferor for resale at his licensed premises and the payment of claims for services rendered, performed, or supplied in connection with the operation of the licensed business, and to the payment of claims of a landlord, to the extent of proceeds on past due rent.

Seventh, to the payment of other claims which have been reduced to court-ordered judgments, including claims for court-ordered support of a minor child.

Eighth, to the payment of all other claims. The payment of these claims if sufficient assets are not available for the payment of the claim in full shall be paid pro rata.

If the transferor licensee disputes any claim, the escrow holder shall notify the claimant, and the amount or pro rata amount thereof shall be retained by the escrow holder for a period of 25 days, and if not attached shall be paid to the transferor licensee. The agreement shall also provide that the escrow holder shall make the payment or distribution within a reasonable time after the completion of the transfer of the license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1570, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

24074.1.

Any person desiring to act as an escrow holder under Section 24074 shall:

1. Comply with all the applicable provisions of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17000) of Division 6 of the Financial Code.

2. Not more than 10 days after receiving a claim from a creditor, said escrow holder shall acknowledge receipt of each claim; and

3. Not more than 10 days after the license has been transferred and prior to the distribution of the assets held by said escrow holder he shall advise each creditor who filed a claim against the escrow whether or not there are sufficient assets in the escrow to pay all creditors in full. If the assets in the escrow are sufficient to pay all creditors in full, said escrow holder shall also advise each creditor of the date on or before which payment will be made. If there are not sufficient assets to pay all creditors in full, he shall then advise each creditor who filed a claim of the following: (a) the total assets placed in escrow with him and the nature of each asset; (b) the name of each creditor who filed a claim against the escrow and the amount of said claim; (c) the amount he proposes to pay each creditor; and (d) the date on or before which said amount will be paid to the creditors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1426.)
-------------------------------------------

24074.2.

Any person desiring to act as an escrow holder under Section 24074 shall not release any funds in the escrow in exchange for a promissory note or in exchange for any other consideration of less value to the creditors than the funds exchanged.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1494.)
-------------------------------------------

24074.3.

(a) Within 30 days after the filing of an application for transfer of a license referred to in Section 24073, the intended transferee shall file with the department a statement executed under penalty of perjury that the purchase price or consideration as set forth in the escrow agreement required by Section 24074 has been deposited with the escrowholder. At the time such statement is filed with the department copies thereof shall be submitted by the intended transferee to the transferor and the escrowholder concerned. The 30-day period specified by this section may be extended by the department for good cause; however, the license shall not be transferred until the statement required by this section is received by the department.

(b) This section shall not apply in the case of transfers for which a guaranty of payment has been filed pursuant to Section 24074.4.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 816.)
-------------------------------------------

24074.4.

(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 24074, no escrow shall be required to be established in connection with the transfer of a business or license if a corporate person files with the department a guaranty of full, prompt, and faithful payment of all claims of bona fide creditors of the licensee, and such guaranty is acceptable to the creditors. The department shall not transfer the license until the guarantor has paid all the creditors’ claims in full and the guarantor has filed with the department a statement executed under penalty of perjury that all conditions of the transfer have been satisfied. Payment of such claims by the guarantor shall be made in United States currency or by certified check in a manner acceptable to the creditors.

(b) This section shall apply only in the case of a transfer involving an off-sale beer and wine license, and in which the guarantor corporation has a net worth on a consolidated basis, according to its most recent audited financial statement, of not less than five million dollars ($5,000,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 816.)
-------------------------------------------

24075.

The provisions of Sections 24073 and 24074 do not apply to any transfer of a license made by an executor, administrator, guardian, conservator, trustee, receiver, except a receiver appointed under the provisions of Section 708.630 of the Code of Civil Procedure, or other person acting in the legal or proper discharge of official duty, or in the discharge of any trust imposed upon the person by law, nor to any transfer or assignment made for the benefit of creditors, nor to a surviving spouse or fiduciary or other person within the meaning of Section 24071.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 497, Sec. 1.5.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 185 of Ch. 497.)
-------------------------------------------

24076.

No licensee shall enter into any agreement wherein he pledges the transfer of his license as security for a loan or as security for the fulfillment of any agreement. No license shall be transferred if the transfer is to satisfy a loan or to fulfill an agreement entered into more than 90 days preceding the date on which the transfer application is filed, or to gain or establish a preference to or for any creditor of the transferor, except as provided by Section 24074, or to defraud or injure any creditor of the transferor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 753.)
-------------------------------------------

24077.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no license shall be transferred into any county having a population of 35,000 or less.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 783.)
-------------------------------------------

24078.

A special onsale general license may be transferred from person to person or from premises to premises, as provided in this article, but only for the operation of the licensed premises as required by Section 23399.2.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1914.)
-------------------------------------------

24079.

(a) An on-sale general license or off-sale general license shall not be transferred for a purchase price or consideration in excess of the original fee paid for that license pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 23320 for a period of two years following the original issuance of that license.

(b) On and after the two-year period following the original issuance of an on-sale general license or off-sale general license, there shall not be a restriction as to the purchase price or consideration paid by a transferee or received by a transferor for an on-sale general license or off-sale general license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 296, Sec. 5.   (AB 2971)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

24080.

Every application filed by the intended transferee with the department for the transfer of an onsale or offsale general license shall indicate whether the consideration, if any, to be paid to the transferor includes payment for any or all of the following:

(a) Inventory.

(b) Fixtures.

(c) Transfer of the license.

The actual amount of the consideration, if any, to be paid for items (a), (b) and (c) is to be indicated in the application.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1689.)
-------------------------------------------

24081.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law in this division including, but not limited to, requirements relating to the issuance or transfer of a license, any licensee whose premises, for which a license, other than an off-sale license, has been issued, have been destroyed as a result of fire or any act of God or other force beyond the control of the licensee may carry on the business for a period of not more than 180 days at a location within 1,000 feet of the premises for which the license was issued and while the premises are being repaired or rebuilt and the licensee shall be entitled to carry on the licensee’s business under the existing license upon the former premises when they have been repaired or
 rebuilt.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law in this division,
 including, but not limited to, requirements relating to the issuance or transfer of a license, any licensee whose premises, for which an off-sale license has been issued, have been destroyed as a result of fire or any act of God or other force beyond the control of the licensee, may carry on the business for a period of not more than 180 days at a location within 1,000 feet of the premises for which the license was issued and while the premises are being repaired or rebuilt and the licensee shall be entitled to carry on the licensee’s business under the existing license upon the former premises when they have been repaired or rebuilt.

(c) The director, in the director’s discretion, may extend the 180-day period described in subdivisions (a) and (b) by 60 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 175, Sec. 2.   (AB 3139)   Effective September 25, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

24082.

The license of a licensee whose licensed premises have been destroyed as a result of fire or act of God or have been taken under the power of eminent domain, may be transferred to another location within the same county without payment of the fee for transfer of a license from one premises to another premises. Within 18 months of the fire or act of God, if the destroyed premises have been reconstructed and the license has not been transferred to another person, the license may be transferred back to the location of the destroyed premises without payment of the fee for transfer of a license from one premises to another premises.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 93, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Suspension and Revocation of Licenses [24200. - 24211.]

24200.

The following are the grounds that constitute a basis for the suspension or revocation of licenses:

(a) When the continuance of a license would be contrary to public welfare or morals. However, proceedings under this subdivision are not a limitation upon the department’s authority to proceed under Section 22 of Article XX of the California Constitution.

(b) Except as limited by Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 25000), the violation or the causing or permitting of a violation by a licensee of this division, any rules of the board adopted pursuant to Part 14 (commencing with Section 32001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, any rules of the department adopted pursuant to the provisions of this division, or any other penal provisions of law of this state prohibiting or regulating the sale, exposing for sale, use, possession, giving away, adulteration, dilution, misbranding, or mislabeling of alcoholic beverages or intoxicating liquors.

(c) The misrepresentation of a material fact by an applicant in obtaining a license.

(d) The plea, verdict, or judgment of guilty, or the plea of nolo contendere to any public offense involving moral turpitude or under any federal law prohibiting or regulating the sale, exposing for sale, use, possession, or giving away of alcoholic beverages or intoxicating liquors or prohibiting the refilling or reuse of distilled spirits containers charged against the licensee.

(e) Failure to take reasonable steps to correct objectionable conditions on the licensed premises, including the immediately adjacent area that is owned, leased, or rented by the licensee, that constitute a nuisance, within a reasonable time after receipt of notice to make those corrections from the department, under Section 373a of the Penal Code. For the purpose of this subdivision only, “property or premises” as used in Section 373a of the Penal Code includes the area immediately adjacent to the licensed premises that is owned, leased, or rented by the licensee.

(f) Failure to take reasonable steps to correct objectionable conditions that occur during business hours on any public sidewalk abutting a licensed premises and constitute a nuisance, within a reasonable time after receipt of notice to correct those conditions from the department. This subdivision shall apply to a licensee only upon written notice to the licensee from the department. The department shall issue this written notice upon its own determination, or upon a request from the local law enforcement agency in whose jurisdiction the premises are located, that is supported by substantial evidence that persistent objectionable conditions are occurring on the public sidewalk abutting the licensed premises. For purposes of this subdivision:

(1) “Any public sidewalk abutting a licensed premises” means the publicly owned, pedestrian-traveled way, not more than 20 feet from the premises, that is located between a licensed premises, including any immediately adjacent area that is owned, leased, or rented by the licensee, and a public street.

(2) “Objectionable conditions that constitute a nuisance” means disturbance of the peace, public drunkenness, drinking in public, harassment of passersby, gambling, prostitution, loitering, public urination, lewd conduct, drug trafficking, or excessive loud noise.

(3) “Reasonable steps” means all of the following:

(A) Calling the local law enforcement agency. Timely calls to the local law enforcement agency that are placed by the licensee, or his or her agents or employees, shall not be construed by the department as evidence of objectionable conditions that constitute a nuisance.

(B) Requesting those persons engaging in activities causing objectionable conditions to cease those activities, unless the licensee, or his or her agents or employees, feel that their personal safety would be threatened in making that request.

(C) Making good faith efforts to remove items that facilitate loitering, such as furniture, except those structures approved or permitted by the local jurisdiction. The licensee shall not be liable for the removal of those items that facilitate loitering.

(4) When determining what constitutes “reasonable steps,” the department shall consider site configuration constraints related to the unique circumstances of the nature of the business.

(g) Subdivision (f) does not apply to a bona fide public eating place, as defined in Section 23038, 23038.1, or 23038.2, that is so operated by a retail on-sale licensee or on-sale beer and wine licensee; a hotel, motel, or similar lodging establishment, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 25503.16; a winegrowers license; a licensed beer manufacturer, as defined in Section 23357; those same or contiguous premises for which a retail licensee concurrently holds an off-sale retail beer and wine license and a beer manufacturer’s license; or those same or contiguous premises at which a retail on-sale licensee or on-sale beer and wine licensee who is licensed as a bona fide public eating place as defined in Section 23038, 23038.1, or 23038.2, a hotel, motel, or similar lodging establishment as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 25503.16, a licensed beer manufacturer, as defined in Section 23357, or a winegrowers license, sells off-sale beer and wine under the licensee’s on-sale license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 625, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

24200.1.

The following are additional bases upon which the department may suspend or revoke a license:

(a) Failure to take reasonable steps to correct objectionable conditions on the licensed premises, including the immediately adjacent area that is owned, leased, or rented by the licensee, that constitute a nuisance within a reasonable time after receipt of notice to make those corrections from a district attorney, city attorney, or a county counsel, under Section 373a of the Penal Code. For the purpose of this subdivision only, “property or premises” as used in Section 373a of the Penal Code includes the area immediately adjacent to the licensed premises that is owned, leased, or rented by the licensee.

(b) Failure to take reasonable steps to correct objectionable conditions that occur during business hours on any public sidewalk abutting a licensed premises and constitute a nuisance within a reasonable time after receipt of notice to correct those conditions from a district attorney, city attorney, or a county counsel. This subdivision shall apply to a licensee only upon written notice to the licensee from a district attorney, city attorney, or a county counsel.

(c) Notwithstanding that the licensee corrects the objectionable conditions that constitute a nuisance, the licensee has a continuing obligation to meet the requirements of subdivisions (a) and (b), and failure to do so shall constitute grounds for disciplinary action pursuant to this section.

(d) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Any public sidewalk abutting a licensed premises” means the publicly owned, pedestrian-traveled way, not more than 20 feet from the premises, that is located between a licensed premises, including any immediately adjacent area that is owned, leased, or rented by the licensee, and a public street.

(2) “Objectionable conditions that constitute a nuisance” means disturbance of the peace, public drunkenness, drinking in public, harassment of passersby, gambling, prostitution, loitering, public urination, lewd conduct, drug trafficking, excessive loud noise, or failure to comply with the minimum operating standards required by Section 25612.5.

(3) “Reasonable steps” means all of the following:

(A) Calling the local law enforcement agency. Timely calls to the local law enforcement agency that are placed by the licensee, or his or her agents or employees, shall not be construed by the department as evidence of objectionable conditions that constitute a nuisance.

(B) Requesting those persons engaging in activities causing objectionable conditions to cease those activities, unless the licensee, or his or her agents or employees, feel that their personal safety would be threatened in making that request.

(C) Making good faith efforts to remove items that facilitate loitering, such as furniture, except those structures approved or permitted by the local jurisdiction. The licensee shall not be liable for the removal of those items that facilitate loitering.

(4) When determining what constitutes “reasonable steps,” the department shall consider site configuration constraints related to the unique circumstances of the nature of the business.

(5) “Reasonable time” shall mean 30 days following service of notice pursuant to either subdivision (a) or subdivision (b) upon a licensee that objectionable conditions exist.

(e) Subdivision (b) does not apply to a bona fide public eating place, as defined in Section 23038, 23038.1, or 23038.2, that is so operated by a retail on-sale licensee or on-sale beer and wine licensee; a hotel, motel, or similar lodging establishment, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 25503.16; a winegrowers license; a licensed beer manufacturer, as defined in Section 23357; those same or contiguous premises for which a retail licensee concurrently holds an off-sale retail beer and wine license and a beer manufacturer’s license; or those same or contiguous premises at which a retail on-sale licensee or on-sale beer and wine licensee who is licensed as a bona fide public eating place as defined in Section 23038, 23038.1, or 23038.2, a hotel, motel, or similar lodging establishment as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 25503.16, a licensed beer manufacturer, as defined in Section 23357, or a winegrowers license, sells off-sale beer and wine under the licensee’s on-sale license.

(f) A hearing for a violation of this section shall be held within 60 days of an accusation being filed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 625, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

24200.5.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 24200, the department shall revoke a license upon any of the following grounds:

(a) If a retail licensee has knowingly permitted the illegal sale, or negotiations for the sales, of controlled substances or dangerous drugs upon his or her licensed premises. Successive sales, or negotiations for sales, over any continuous period of time shall be deemed evidence of permission. As used in this section, “controlled substances” shall have the same meaning as is given that term in Article 1 (commencing with Section 11000) of Chapter 1 of Division 10 of the Health and Safety Code, and “dangerous drugs” shall have the same meaning as is given that term in Article 2 (commencing with Section 4015) of Chapter 9 of Division 2 of this code.

(b) If the licensee has employed or permitted any persons to solicit or encourage others, directly or indirectly, to buy them drinks in the licensed premises under any commission, percentage, salary, or other profit-sharing plan, scheme, or conspiracy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 349, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

24200.6.

The department may revoke or suspend any license if the licensee or the agent or employee of the licensee violates any provision of Section 11364.7 of the Health and Safety Code. For purposes of this provision, a licensee, or the agent or employee of the licensee, is deemed to have knowledge that the item or items delivered, furnished, transferred, or possessed will be used to plant, propagate, cultivate, grow, harvest, compound, convert, produce, process, prepare, test, analyze, pack, repack, store, contain, conceal, inject, ingest, inhale, or otherwise introduce into the human body a controlled substance, if the department or any other state or local law enforcement agency notifies the licensee in writing that the items, individually or in combination, are commonly sold or marketed for that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1027, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

24200.7.

The department shall revoke or suspend any license if the licensee or the agent or employee of the licensee manufactures, distributes, or offers for retail sale powdered alcohol.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 778, Sec. 4.   (SB 819)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

24200.8.

In determining the level of discipline for a violation of Section 25602 or 25658, the department may consider as a factor whether there is subsequent death or great bodily injury to the person who is sold, served, furnished, or given the alcoholic beverage, to any other person, or to both.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 613, Sec. 2.   (SB 498)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

24201.

Accusations may be made to the department by any person against any licensee. Accusations shall be in writing and shall state one or more grounds which would authorize the department to suspend or revoke the license or licenses of the licensee against whom the accusation is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 447.)
-------------------------------------------

24202.

(a) All state and local law enforcement agencies shall immediately notify the department of any arrests made by them for violations over which the department has jurisdiction which involve a licensee or licensed premises. Notice shall be given within 10 days of the arrest. The department shall promptly cause an investigation to be made as to whether grounds exist for suspension or revocation of the license or licenses of the licensee.

(b) The department may not open or add an entry to a file or initiate an investigation of a licensee or suspend or revoke a license (1) solely because the licensee or an agent acting on behalf of the licensee has reported to a state or local law enforcement agency that suspected controlled substance violations have taken place on the licensed premises or (2) solely based on activities constituting violations described in such a report, unless the violations reported occurred with the actual knowledge and willful consent of the licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 695, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

24203.

Accusations against any on-sale or off-sale licensee may be filed with the department by the legislative body, or chief of police, of any city in which the premises in question are located, or if the premises are in unincorporated territory, then by the board of supervisors, or the sheriff, of the county, requesting the suspension or revocation of any retail license. Upon the filing of the accusation, the department shall provide for a public hearing thereon within the county in which the premises are located and determine whether or not the license should be revoked or suspended. Whenever the local legislative body, the chief of police, or the sheriff, certifies that the public safety, health, or welfare requires an immediate hearing of the accusation, the public hearing shall be held within 60 days after the filing of the accusation with the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 457, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

24204.

The Director of the State Department of Public Health shall immediately notify the department of the conviction of any licensee of any violation of the Sherman Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Law in connection with alcoholic beverages. The department shall promptly cause an investigation to be made as to whether grounds exist for suspension or revocation of the license of such licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 478, Sec. 1.   (AB 1724)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

24205.

The license of any taxpayer shall be automatically suspended upon cancellation of his or her bond, or if the bond becomes void or unenforceable for any reason, or if the taxpayer fails to pay any taxes or penalties due under the Sales and Use Tax Law (Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code), the Bradley-Burns Uniform Local Sales and Use Tax Law (Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code), or the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code), when that tax liability arises in whole or in part from the exercise of the privilege of an alcoholic beverage license, or under the Alcoholic Beverage Tax Law (Part 14 (commencing with Section 32001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code). The license shall be automatically reinstated if the taxpayer files a valid bond, or pays his or her delinquent taxes, as the case may be. A suspension under this section for a tax delinquency may only be imposed if the taxpayer is at least three months delinquent.

Upon the petition of any taxpayer whose license has been suspended under this section, a hearing shall be afforded him or her after five days’ notice of the time and place of hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 409, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

24206.

All accusations against licensees for violating or permitting the violation of Sections 24750 to 24757, inclusive, 24850 to 24881, inclusive, 25000 to 25010, inclusive, 25170 to 25238, inclusive, 25600, 25602, 25607, 25609, 25610, 25611, 25612, 25615, 25630, 25631, 25632, 25633, 25656, 25658, 25663, 25664, or 25665, shall be filed within one year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1040.)
-------------------------------------------

24207.

All accusations against licensees for violating or permitting the violation of Sections 23300, 23355, 23431, 23453, 24200.5, 25500 to 25508, inclusive, 25601, 25616, or 25657, shall be filed within three years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1962.)
-------------------------------------------

24208.

The periods of one year and three years referred to in Sections 24206 and 24207 shall commence to run as follows:

(a) If the act or omission alleged as the basis for the suspension or revocation of the license constituted a single transaction, then from the date of the transaction.

(b) If the act or omission alleged as the basis for the suspension or revocation of the license is of a continuing nature, relating to a condition, or if the occurrence of several acts or omissions is necessary for the institution of disciplinary proceedings, then from the date of the last act or omission.

(c) If the act or omission alleged as the basis for the suspension or revocation of the license involved fraud, misrepresentation, or concealment, then from the date of the discovery thereof.

(d) If the basis for the suspension or revocation of the license is a criminal conviction, then from the date such criminal conviction becomes final.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1962.)
-------------------------------------------

24209.

When an arrest is made of any person, for a violation of this division, the arresting officer may release such person without taking such person before a magistrate upon such person’s signing an agreement to appear in court or before a magistrate at a place and time designated by the arresting officer; provided, that when an arrest is made of a licensee or employee of a licensee the arresting officer shall release such licensee or employee without taking such licensee or employee before a magistrate upon such licensee or employee signing an agreement to appear in court or before a magistrate at a place and time designated by an arresting officer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 199.)
-------------------------------------------

24211.

The department may on its own motion at any time before a penalty assessment is placed into effect and without any further proceedings, review the penalty, but such review shall be limited to its reduction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 777.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Hearings [24300. - 24400.]

24300.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 11440.30 of the Government Code, hearings held on a protest, accusation, or petition for a license may be conducted, in whole or in part, by electronic means.

(b) Any hearing that is conducted in person shall be held in the county in which the licensed premises or the licensee is located. If any part of the hearing is conducted by electronic means, the location of the hearing may be any place from which the department or any of the parties participates in the hearing. A hearing before the department itself on reconsideration or under subdivision (c) of Section 11517 of the Government Code may be held at any place in the state where the department is meeting.

(c) Except as provided in Section 24203 and in this section, the proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing
 with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and in all cases the department shall have all the powers granted therein. The department, in its exclusive discretion, shall consider scheduling the hearing, including all or any portion of a hearing conducted by electronic means, at a time, including evening hours, and at a place convenient to all parties to a proceeding, including those witnesses required to be present, and the public affected.

(d) If a hearing or any part of a hearing is noticed to be conducted by electronic means, any party may file a written motion to object to the electronic hearing and to request that the hearing, or portion of the hearing, to be conducted by electronic means be held in person and without the use of electronic communication. That motion shall include a proposed county for the location of the hearing and shall establish good cause as to why an electronic hearing, in whole or in part, would be inappropriate. A motion requesting an in-person hearing shall be made to the presiding officer in the same manner as a continuance request pursuant to Section 11524 of the Government Code.

(e) For any hearing held pursuant to this division, the department may delegate the power to hear and decide to an administrative law judge appointed by the director. Any hearing before an administrative law judge shall be pursuant to the procedures, rules, and limitations prescribed in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 136, Sec. 4.   (SB 1011)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

24301.

The department shall not create a record by videographic recording. Videographic recording of a hearing shall be inadmissible in any proceeding before the Alcoholic Beverage Control Appeals Board or in any proceeding taken under Section 23090.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 209, Sec. 1.   (AB 1285)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

24310.

(a) Any person requesting a transcript from the department in a case on appeal to the Alcoholic Beverage Control Appeals Board, shall pay the transcript cost specified in Section 69950 of the Government Code. Any actual cost in excess thereof shall be paid by the Appeals Board from the Alcoholic Beverage Control Appeals Fund.

(b) A party in a case on appeal to the Appeals Board who, in 1983 or 1984, has paid that portion of the transcript fee in excess of the fee specified in Section 69950 of the Government Code shall be refunded that excess by payment from the Alcoholic Beverage Control Appeals Fund, providing the Appeals Board has not issued a dismissal or other final decision in the case on appeal.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 273, Sec. 3.   Effective July 3, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

24400.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, two or more retail licensees of the same type may agree to group purchase distilled spirits and wine from a licensed wholesaler or rectifier through a designated agent, subject to the following restrictions:

(a) The designated agent shall hold a retail license of the same type operating a premises in the same county or counties as the purchasing group.

(b) No retailer shall have more than one designated agent nor shall an agent make purchases for more than one group.

(c) The merchandise purchased for each group shall be delivered to and stored in either a single licensed premises or a single warehouse located in the same county as the premises of the purchasing group and such delivery shall be a single delivery within two consecutive business days at the discount in effect on the day the delivery was commenced. Saturday, Sunday, and holidays shall not be deemed business days.
